Hawaii statutes.
§806-2 Inapplicable to district courts.
Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter that the same applies to courts
of record, such provision shall not, without more, apply to district courts. [L
1971, c 144, §31B; HRS §711-2; ren L 1972, c 9, pt of §1]

Case Notes

As the plain language of this section limits the application
of the criminal procedure provisions of this chapter to the circuit courts, the
appellate court erred by extending the application of §806-28 to the district
courts. 127 H. 48, 276 P.3d 617 (2012).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next